Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2204
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-2205 to 81-2211.03 shall be used.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 6.